Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the
following purposes:
(1) Operations.................................  $ 227,256
(2) Appeals and special advocacy ... $ 5,072,228
(3) Strategic partnership ................ $ 3,767,569
(4) Aging veteran services ............. $ 729,984
(5) Debt service .............................. $ 376,828
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from  the Veterans’ Services Fund established
under ORS 406.140 to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 2,766,920
(2) Appeals and special advocacy ... $ 2,171,523
(3) Strategic partnership ................ $ 14,595,917
(4) Aging veteran services ............. $ 3,606,304
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $551,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic  De-
velopment Fund to the Department of Veterans’ Affairs for debt  service related to the
veterans’ affordable housing project.
SECTION 4.
(1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the following
amounts are established  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and the Oregon War Veterans’ Bond  Sinking Account, but excluding lottery funds and fed-
eral funds, collected or received by the  Department of Veterans’ Affairs for the following
purposes:
(a) Operations.................................  $ 20,911,033
(b) Home loan program .................. $ 5,936,773
(c) Oregon Veterans’ Home
Enrolled House Bill 5038 (HB 5038-A) Page 1
program .................................... $121,496,448
(d) Capital improvements ............... $ 3,890,725
(2) This section does not limit expenditures from the Oregon War Veterans’ Bond Sinking
Account for purposes described in section 6 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$4,123,106 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department of Veterans’
Affairs.
SECTION 6. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, expenditures by the Department
of Veterans’ Affairs for the following purposes are not limited:
(1) Debt service;
(2) Professional services and related costs associated directly with bond sales;
(3) Loans to veterans; and
(4) Payments on behalf of borrowers for  property taxes, city liens, fire insurance, mort-
gage cancellation insurance and repairs to and miscellaneous charges for  borrower-owned
property that are charged to the loan account and repaid along with the payment  of loan
interest and principal.
SECTION 7.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5038 (HB 5038-A) Page 2